Virginia statutes. Title 8.9A. Commercial Code — Secured Transactions.
Priority.

§ 8.9A-317.
Interests that take priority over or take free of security interest or agricultural lien.

Conflicting security interests and rights of lien creditors. A security interest or agricultural lien is subordinate to the rights of:

a person entitled to priority under §

8.9A-322

; and

except as otherwise provided in subsection (e), a person that becomes a lien creditor before the earlier of the time:

the security interest or agricultural lien is perfected; or

one of the conditions specified in subdivision (b)(3) of §

8.9A-203

is met and a financing statement covering the collateral is filed.

Buyers that receive delivery. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e), a buyer, other than a secured party, of tangible chattel paper, tangible documents, goods, instruments, or a certificated security takes free of a security interest or agricultural lien if the buyer gives value and receives delivery of the collateral without knowledge of the security interest or agricultural lien and before it is perfected.

Lessees that receive delivery. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e), a lessee of goods takes free of a security interest or agricultural lien if the lessee gives value and receives delivery of the collateral without knowledge of the security interest or agricultural lien and before it is perfected.

Licensees and buyers of certain collateral. A licensee of a general intangible or a buyer, other than a secured party, of collateral other than tangible chattel paper, tangible documents, goods, instruments, or a certificated security takes free of a security interest if the licensee or buyer gives value without knowledge of the security interest and before it is perfected.

Purchase-money security interest. Except as otherwise provided in §§

8.9A-320

and

8.9A-321

, if a person files a financing statement with respect to a purchase-money security interest before or within twenty days after the debtor receives delivery of the collateral, the security interest takes priority over the rights of a buyer, lessee, or lien creditor which arise between the time the security interest attaches and the time of filing.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-301; 1973, c. 509; 1983, c. 204; 1991, c. 536, §

8.2A-307

; 1996, c. 216; 2000, c. 1007; 2004, c. 200; 2012, c. 155.

Editor’s note.

This section divides the second clause in the uniform act’s § 9-317 (a) (2) into separate subdivisions designated §

8.9A-317 (a)

(2) (A) and §

8.9A-317 (a)

(2) (B). It also adds the additional requirement that “one of the conditions specified in subdivision (b) (3) of §

8.9A-203

is met” to the uniform act’s requirement that a financing statement covering the collateral be filed.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 200 inserted “tangible” in subsection (b); and inserted “electronic documents” in subsection (d).

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 155, effective July 1, 2013, substituted “a certificated security takes” for “a security certificate takes” near the middle of subsection (b), and substituted “of collateral other than tangible chattel paper, tangible documents, goods, instruments, or a certificated security” for “of accounts, electronic chattel paper, electronic documents, general intangibles, or investment property other than a certificated security” near the middle of subsection (d).

Law Review.

For article, “The Purchase Money Security Interest in Inventory Versus the After-Acquired Property Interest — A ‘No Win’ Situation,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 235 (1986).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Assignments for the Benefit of Creditors, § 33; 2A M.J. Attachment and Garnishment, § 62; 3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 100.2, 101.1.

§ 8.9A-318.
No interest retained in right to payment that is sold; rights and title of seller of account or chattel paper with respect to creditors and purchasers.

Seller retains no interest. A debtor that has sold an account, chattel paper, payment intangible, or promissory note does not retain a legal or equitable interest in the collateral sold.

Deemed rights of debtor if buyer’s security interest unperfected. For purposes of determining the rights of creditors of, and purchasers for value of an account or chattel paper from, a debtor that has sold an account or chattel paper, while the buyer’s security interest is unperfected, the debtor is deemed to have rights and title to the account or chattel paper identical to those the debtor sold.

History.

2000, c. 1007.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 100.1.

§ 8.9A-319.
Rights and title of consignee with respect to creditors and purchasers.

Consignee has consignor’s rights. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), for purposes of determining the rights of creditors of, and purchasers for value of goods from, a consignee, while the goods are in the possession of the consignee, the consignee is deemed to have rights and title to the goods identical to those the consignor had or had power to transfer.

Applicability of other law. For purposes of determining the rights of a creditor of a consignee, law other than this title determines the rights and title of a consignee while goods are in the consignee’s possession if, under this part, a perfected security interest held by the consignor would have priority over the rights of the creditor.

History.

2000, c. 1007.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2C M.J. Bankruptcy, § 60; 3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 100.1.

§ 8.9A-320.
Buyer of goods.

Buyer in ordinary course of business. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e), a buyer in ordinary course of business, other than a person buying farm products from a person engaged in farming operations, takes free of a security interest created by the buyer’s seller, even if the security interest is perfected and the buyer knows of its existence.

Buyer of consumer goods. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e), a buyer of goods from a person who used or bought the goods for use primarily for personal, family, or household purposes takes free of a security interest, even if perfected, if the buyer buys:

without knowledge of the security interest;

for value;

primarily for the buyer’s personal, family, or household purposes; and

before the filing of a financing statement covering the goods.

Effectiveness of filing for subsection (b). To the extent that it affects the priority of a security interest over a buyer of goods under subsection (b), the period of effectiveness of a filing made in the jurisdiction in which the seller is located is governed by subsections (a) and (b) of §

8.9A-316

.

Buyer in ordinary course of business at wellhead or minehead. A buyer in ordinary course of business buying oil, gas, or other minerals at the wellhead or minehead or after extraction takes free of an interest arising out of an encumbrance.

Possessory security interest not affected. Subsections (a) and (b) do not affect a security interest in goods in the possession of the secured party under §

8.9A-313

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 6-558, 55-146; 1956, c. 602; 1964, c. 219, § 8.9-307; 1973, c. 509; 1986, c. 484; 1987, c. 657; 2000, c. 1007.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1426 (1973).

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1977-1978, see 64 Va. L. Rev. 1383 (1978).

For note on the buyer in the ordinary course of business and on section 1403 of the Federal Aviation Act, see 36 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 205 (1979).

For 1987 survey of Virginia commercial law, see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 693 (1987).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Assignments for the Benefit of Creditors, § 49; 3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 100.2.

§ 8.9A-321.
Licensee of general intangible and lessee of goods in ordinary course of business.

“Licensee in ordinary course of business.” In this section, “licensee in ordinary course of business” means a person that becomes a licensee of a general intangible in good faith, without knowledge that the license violates the rights of another person in the general intangible, and in the ordinary course from a person in the business of licensing general intangibles of that kind. A person becomes a licensee in the ordinary course if the license to the person comports with the usual or customary practices in the kind of business in which the licensor is engaged or with the licensor’s own usual or customary practices.

Rights of licensee in ordinary course of business. A licensee in ordinary course of business takes its rights under a nonexclusive license free of a security interest in the general intangible created by the licensor, even if the security interest is perfected and the licensee knows of its existence.

Rights of lessee in ordinary course of business. A lessee in ordinary course of business takes its leasehold interest free of a security interest in the goods created by the lessor, even if the security interest is perfected and the lessee knows of its existence.

History.

1991, c. 536, §§

8.2A-103

,

8.2A-307

; 2000, c. 1007.

§ 8.9A-322.
Priorities among conflicting security interests in and agricultural liens on same collateral.

General priority rules. Except as otherwise provided in this section, priority among conflicting security interests and agricultural liens in the same collateral is determined according to the following rules:

Conflicting perfected security interests and agricultural liens rank according to priority in time of filing or perfection. Priority dates from the earlier of the time a filing covering the collateral is first made or the security interest or agricultural lien is first perfected, if there is no period thereafter when there is neither filing nor perfection.

A perfected security interest or agricultural lien has priority over a conflicting unperfected security interest or agricultural lien.

The first security interest or agricultural lien to attach or become effective has priority if conflicting security interests and agricultural liens are unperfected.

Time of perfection; proceeds and supporting obligations. For the purposes of subsection (a) (1):

the time of filing or perfection as to a security interest in collateral is also the time of filing or perfection as to a security interest in proceeds; and

the time of filing or perfection as to a security interest in collateral supported by a supporting obligation is also the time of filing or perfection as to a security interest in the supporting obligation.

Special priority rules: proceeds and supporting obligations. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f), a security interest in collateral which qualifies for priority over a conflicting security interest under §§

8.9A-327

,

8.9A-328

,

8.9A-329

,

8.9A-330

or §

8.9A-331

also has priority over a conflicting security interest in:

any supporting obligation for the collateral; and

proceeds of the collateral if:

the security interest in proceeds is perfected;

the proceeds are cash proceeds or of the same type as the collateral; and

in the case of proceeds that are proceeds of proceeds, all intervening proceeds are cash proceeds, proceeds of the same type as the collateral, or an account relating to the collateral.

First-to-file priority rule for certain collateral. Subject to subsection (e) and except as otherwise provided in subsection (f), if a security interest in chattel paper, deposit accounts, negotiable documents, instruments, investment property, or letter-of-credit rights is perfected by a method other than filing, conflicting perfected security interests in proceeds of the collateral rank according to priority in time of filing.

Applicability of subsection (d). Subsection (d) applies only if the proceeds of the collateral are not cash proceeds, chattel paper, negotiable documents, instruments, investment property, or letter-of-credit rights.

Limitations on subsections (a) through (e). Subsections (a) through (e) are subject to:

subsection (g) and the other provisions of this part;

§

8.4-210

with respect to a security interest of a collecting bank;

§

8.5A-118

with respect to a security interest of an issuer or nominated person; and

§

8.9A-110

with respect to a security interest arising under Title 8.2 or Title 8.2A.

Priority under agricultural lien statute. A perfected agricultural lien on collateral has priority over a conflicting security interest in or agricultural lien on the same collateral if the statute creating the agricultural lien so provides.

History.

Code 1950, §

43-27

; 1964, c. 219, § 8.9-312; 1966, c. 557; 1973, c. 509; 1983, c. 204; 1984, c. 613; 1996, c. 216; 2000, c. 1007.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1426 (1973).

For article, “The Purchase Money Security Interest in Inventory Versus the After-Acquired Property Interest — A ‘No Win’ Situation,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 235 (1986).

For survey on commercial law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 523 (1989).

§ 8.9A-323.
Future advances.

When priority based on time of advance. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), for purposes of determining the priority of a perfected security interest under §

8.9A-322 (a)

(1), perfection of the security interest dates from the time an advance is made to the extent that the security interest secures an advance that:

is made while the security interest is perfected only:

under §

8.9A-309

when it attaches; or

temporarily under §

8.9A-312 (e)

, (f), or (g); and

is not made pursuant to a commitment entered into before or while the security interest is perfected by a method other than under §

8.9A-309

or §

8.9A-312 (e)

, (f), or (g).

Lien creditor. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), a security interest is subordinate to the rights of a person that becomes a lien creditor to the extent that the security interest secures an advance made more than forty-five days after the person becomes a lien creditor unless the advance is made:

without knowledge of the lien; or

pursuant to a commitment entered into without knowledge of the lien.

Buyer of receivables. Subsections (a) and (b) do not apply to a security interest held by a secured party that is a buyer of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes or a consignor.

Buyer of goods. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e), a buyer of goods other than a buyer in ordinary course of business takes free of a security interest to the extent that it secures advances made after the earlier of:

the time the secured party acquires knowledge of the buyer’s purchase; or

forty-five days after the purchase.

Advances made pursuant to commitment; priority of buyer of goods. Subsection (d) does not apply if the advance is made pursuant to a commitment entered into without knowledge of the buyer’s purchase and before the expiration of the forty-five day period.

Lessee of goods. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (g), a lessee of goods, other than a lessee in ordinary course of business, takes the leasehold interest free of a security interest to the extent that it secures advances made after the earlier of:

the time the secured party acquires knowledge of the lease; or

forty-five days after the lease contract becomes enforceable.

Advances made pursuant to commitment: priority of lessee of goods. Subsection (f) does not apply if the advance is made pursuant to a commitment entered into without knowledge of the lease and before the expiration of the forty-five day period.

History.

Code 1950, §

43-27

; 1964, c. 219, §§ 8.9-301, 8.9-307, 8.9-312; 1966, c. 557; 1973, c. 509; 1983, c. 204; 1984, c. 613; 1991, c. 536, §

8.2A-307

; 1996, c. 216; 2000, c. 1007.

§ 8.9A-324.
Priority of purchase-money security interests.

General rule; purchase-money priority. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (g), a perfected purchase-money security interest in goods other than inventory or livestock has priority over a conflicting security interest in the same goods, and, except as otherwise provided in §

8.9A-327

, a perfected security interest in its identifiable proceeds also has priority, if the purchase-money security interest is perfected when the debtor receives possession of the collateral or within twenty days thereafter.

Inventory purchase-money priority. Subject to subsection (c) and except as otherwise provided in subsection (g), a perfected purchase-money security interest in inventory has priority over a conflicting security interest in the same inventory, has priority over a conflicting security interest in chattel paper or an instrument constituting proceeds of the inventory and in proceeds of the chattel paper, if so provided in §

8.9A-330

, and, except as otherwise provided in §

8.9A-327

, also has priority in identifiable cash proceeds of the inventory to the extent the identifiable cash proceeds are received on or before the delivery of the inventory to a buyer, if:

the purchase-money security interest is perfected when the debtor receives possession of the inventory;

the purchase-money secured party sends an authenticated notification to the holder of the conflicting security interest;

the holder of the conflicting security interest receives the notification within five years before the debtor receives possession of the inventory; and

the notification states that the person sending the notification has or expects to acquire a purchase-money security interest in inventory of the debtor and describes the inventory.

Holders of conflicting inventory security interests to be notified. Subsections (b) (2) through (4) apply only if the holder of the conflicting security interest had filed a financing statement covering the same types of inventory:

if the purchase-money security interest is perfected by filing, before the date of the filing; or

if the purchase-money security interest is temporarily perfected without filing or possession under §

8.9A-312 (f)

, before the beginning of the twenty-day period thereunder.

Livestock purchase-money priority. Subject to subsection (e) and except as otherwise provided in subsection (g), a perfected purchase-money security interest in livestock that are farm products has priority over a conflicting security interest in the same livestock, and, except as otherwise provided in §

8.9A-327

, a perfected security interest in their identifiable proceeds and identifiable products in their unmanufactured states also has priority, if:

the purchase-money security interest is perfected when the debtor receives possession of the livestock;

the purchase-money secured party sends an authenticated notification to the holder of the conflicting security interest;

the holder of the conflicting security interest receives the notification within six months before the debtor receives possession of the livestock; and

the notification states that the person sending the notification has or expects to acquire a purchase-money security interest in livestock of the debtor and describes the livestock.

Holders of conflicting livestock security interests to be notified. Subsections (d) (2) through (4) apply only if the holder of the conflicting security interest had filed a financing statement covering the same types of livestock:

if the purchase-money security interest is perfected by filing, before the date of the filing; or

if the purchase-money security interest is temporarily perfected without filing or possession under §

8.9A-312 (f)

, before the beginning of the twenty-day period thereunder.

Software purchase-money priority. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (g), a perfected purchase-money security interest in software has priority over a conflicting security interest in the same collateral, and, except as otherwise provided in §

8.9A-327

, a perfected security interest in its identifiable proceeds also has priority, to the extent that the purchase-money security interest in the goods in which the software was acquired for use has priority in the goods and proceeds of the goods under this section.

Conflicting purchase-money security interests. If more than one security interest qualifies for priority in the same collateral under subsection (a), (b), (d), or (f):

a security interest securing an obligation incurred as all or part of the price of the collateral has priority over a security interest securing an obligation incurred for value given to enable the debtor to acquire rights in or the use of collateral; and

in all other cases, §

8.9A-322 (a)

applies to the qualifying security interests.

History.

Code 1950, §

43-27

; 1964, c. 219, § 8.9-312; 1966, c. 557; 1973, c. 509; 1983, c. 204; 1984, c. 613; 1996, c. 216; 2000, c. 1007.

§ 8.9A-325.
Priority of security interests in transferred collateral.

Subordination of security interest in transferred collateral. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), a security interest created by a debtor is subordinate to a security interest in the same collateral created by another person if:

the debtor acquired the collateral subject to the security interest created by the other person;

the security interest created by the other person was perfected when the debtor acquired the collateral; and

there is no period thereafter when the security interest is unperfected.

Limitation of subsection (a) subordination. Subsection (a) subordinates a security interest only if the security interest:

otherwise would have priority solely under §

8.9A-322 (a)

or §

8.9A-324

; or

arose solely under §

8.2-711 (3)

or §

8.2A-508 (5)

.

History.

2000, c. 1007.

§ 8.9A-326.
Priority of security interests created by new debtor.

Subordination of security interest created by new debtor. Subject to subsection (b), a security interest that is created by a new debtor in collateral in which the new debtor has or acquires rights and is perfected by a filed financing statement that would be ineffective to perfect the security interest but for the application of §

8.9A-316(i)(1)

or

8.9A-508

is subordinate to a security interest in the same collateral which is perfected other than by such a filed financing statement.

Priority under other provisions; multiple original debtors. The other provisions of this part determine the priority among conflicting security interests in the same collateral perfected by filed financing statements described in subsection (a). However, if the security agreements to which a new debtor became bound as debtor were not entered into by the same original debtor, the conflicting security interests rank according to priority in time of the new debtor’s having become bound.

History.

2000, c. 1007; 2012, c. 155.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 155, effective July 1, 2013, rewrote subsection (a), and substituted “statement described in subsection (a)” for “statements that are effective solely under §

8.9A-508

” at the end of the first sentence of subsecton (b).

§ 8.9A-327.
Priority of security interests in deposit account.

The following rules govern priority among conflicting security interests in the same deposit account:

A security interest held by a secured party having control of the deposit account under §

8.9A-104

has priority over a conflicting security interest held by a secured party that does not have control.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (3) and (4), security interests perfected by control under §

8.9A-314

rank according to priority in time of obtaining control.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (4), a security interest held by the bank with which the deposit account is maintained has priority over a conflicting security interest held by another secured party.

A security interest perfected by control under §

8.9A-104 (a)

(3) has priority over a security interest held by the bank with which the deposit account is maintained.

History.

1996, c. 216, § 8.9-115; 2000, c. 1007.

§ 8.9A-328.
Priority of security interests in investment property.

The following rules govern priority among conflicting security interests in the same investment property:

A security interest held by a secured party having control of investment property under §

8.9A-106

has priority over a security interest held by a secured party that does not have control of the investment property.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (3) and (4), conflicting security interests held by secured parties each of which has control under §

8.9A-106

rank according to priority in time of:

if the collateral is a security, obtaining control;

if the collateral is a security entitlement carried in a securities account and:

if the secured party obtained control under §

8.8A-106 (d)

(1), the secured party’s becoming the person for which the securities account is maintained;

if the secured party obtained control under §

8.8A-106 (d)

(2), the securities intermediary’s agreement to comply with the secured party’s entitlement orders with respect to security entitlements carried or to be carried in the securities account; or

if the secured party obtained control through another person under § 8.8A-106 (d) (3), the time on which priority would be based under this paragraph if the other person were the secured party; or

if the collateral is a commodity contract carried with a commodity intermediary, the satisfaction of the requirement for control specified in §

8.9A-106

(b) (2) with respect to commodity contracts carried or to be carried with the commodity intermediary.

A security interest held by a securities intermediary in a security entitlement or a securities account maintained with the securities intermediary has priority over a conflicting security interest held by another secured party.

A security interest held by a commodity intermediary in a commodity contract or a commodity account maintained with the commodity intermediary has priority over a conflicting security interest held by another secured party.

A security interest in a certificated security in registered form which is perfected by taking delivery under §

8.9A-313 (a)

and not by control under §

8.9A-314

has priority over a conflicting security interest perfected by a method other than control.

Conflicting security interests created by a broker, securities intermediary, or commodity intermediary which are perfected without control under §

8.9A-106

rank equally.

In all other cases, priority among conflicting security interests in investment property is governed by §§

8.9A-322

and

8.9A-323

.

History.

1996, c. 216, § 8.9-115; 2000, c. 1007.

§ 8.9A-329.
Priority of security interests in letter-of-credit right.

The following rules govern priority among conflicting security interests in the same letter-of-credit right:

A security interest held by a secured party having control of the letter-of-credit right under §

8.9A-107

has priority to the extent of its control over a conflicting security interest held by a secured party that does not have control.

Security interests perfected by control under §

8.9A-314

rank according to priority in time of obtaining control.

History.

2000, c. 1007.

§ 8.9A-330.
Priority of purchaser of chattel paper or instrument.

Purchaser’s priority; security interest claimed merely as proceeds. A purchaser of chattel paper has priority over a security interest in the chattel paper which is claimed merely as proceeds of inventory subject to a security interest if:

in good faith and in the ordinary course of the purchaser’s business, the purchaser gives new value and takes possession of the chattel paper or obtains control of the chattel paper under §

8.9A-105

; and

the chattel paper does not indicate that it has been assigned to an identified assignee other than the purchaser.

Purchaser’s priority; other security interests. A purchaser of chattel paper has priority over a security interest in the chattel paper which is claimed other than merely as proceeds of inventory subject to a security interest if the purchaser gives new value and takes possession of the chattel paper or obtains control of the chattel paper under §

8.9A-105

in good faith, in the ordinary course of the purchaser’s business, and without knowledge that the purchase violates the rights of the secured party.

Chattel paper purchaser’s priority in proceeds. Except as otherwise provided in §

8.9A-327

, a purchaser having priority in chattel paper under subsection (a) or (b) also has priority in proceeds of the chattel paper to the extent that:

§

8.9A-322

provides for priority in the proceeds; or

the proceeds consist of the specific goods covered by the chattel paper or cash proceeds of the specific goods, even if the purchaser’s security interest in the proceeds is unperfected.

Instrument purchaser’s priority. Except as otherwise provided in §

8.9A-331 (a)

, a purchaser of an instrument has priority over a security interest in the instrument perfected by a method other than possession if the purchaser gives value and takes possession of the instrument in good faith and without knowledge that the purchase violates the rights of the secured party.

Holder of purchase-money security interest gives new value. For purposes of subsections (a) and (b), the holder of a purchase-money security interest in inventory gives new value for chattel paper constituting proceeds of the inventory.

Indication of assignment gives knowledge. For purposes of subsections (b) and (d), if chattel paper or an instrument indicates that it has been assigned to an identified secured party other than the purchaser, a purchaser of the chattel paper or instrument has knowledge that the purchase violates the rights of the secured party.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 6-558, 6-559; 1964, c. 219, § 8.9-308; 1973, c. 509; 2000, c. 1007.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1426 (1973).

For note, “Priority Contests Under Article 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code: A Purposive Interpretation of a Statutory Puzzle,” see 72 Va. L. Rev. 1155 (1986).

§ 8.9A-331.
Priority of rights of purchasers of instruments, documents, and securities under other titles, priority of interests in financial assets and security entitlements under Title 8.8A.

Rights under

Titles 8.3

A, 8.7, and 8.8A not limited. This title does not limit the rights of a holder in due course of a negotiable instrument, a holder to which a negotiable document of title has been duly negotiated, or a protected purchaser of a security. These holders or purchasers take priority over an earlier security interest, even if perfected, to the extent provided in

Titles 8.3

A, 8.7, and 8.8A.

Protection under Title 8.8A. This title does not limit the rights of or impose liability on a person to the extent that the person is protected against the assertion of a claim under Title 8.8A.

Filing not notice. Filing under this title does not constitute notice of a claim or defense to the holders, or purchasers, or persons described in subsections (a) and (b).

History.

Code 1950, § 6-558; 1964, c. 219, § 8.9-309; 1984, c. 613; 1996, c. 216; 2000, c. 1007.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1426 (1973).

§ 8.9A-332.
Transfer of money, transfer of funds from deposit account.

Transferee of money. A transferee of money takes the money free of a security interest unless the transferee acts in collusion with the debtor in violating the rights of the secured party.

Transferee of funds from deposit account. A transferee of funds from a deposit account takes the funds free of a security interest in the deposit account unless the transferee acts in collusion with the debtor in violating the rights of the secured party.

History.

2000, c. 1007.

§ 8.9A-333.
Priority of certain liens arising by operation of law.

“Possessory lien.” In this section, “possessory lien” means an interest, other than a security interest or an agricultural lien:

which secures payment or performance of an obligation for services or materials furnished with respect to goods by a person in the ordinary course of the person’s business;

which is created by statute or rule of law in favor of the person; and

whose effectiveness depends on the person’s possession of the goods.

Priority of possessory lien. A possessory lien on goods has priority over a security interest in the goods unless the lien is created by a statute that expressly provides otherwise.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-310; 2000, c. 1007.

Law Review.

For comment on cumulative remedies under Article 9 of the UCC, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 213 (1972).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2B M.J. Automobiles, § 130; 2C M.J. Bankruptcy, §§ 73, 77, 135; 5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 104; 7A M.J. Estoppel, § 10; 8A M.J. Exemptions from Execution and Attachment, §§ 8, 12, 13, 16, 22, 25; 9A M.J. Fraudulent and Voluntary Conveyances, § 43; 14B M.J. Pensions, § 2; 16 M.J. Setoff, Recoupment and Counterclaim, § 22.12A M.J. Liens, § 16; 12B M.J. Mechanics’ Liens, § 36.

§ 8.9A-334.
Priority of security interests in fixtures and crops.

Security interest in fixtures under this title. A security interest under this title may be created in goods that are fixtures or may continue in goods that become fixtures. A security interest does not exist under this title in ordinary building materials incorporated into an improvement on land.

Security interest in fixtures under real property law. This title does not prevent creation of an encumbrance upon fixtures under real property law.

General rule; subordination of security interest in fixtures. In cases not governed by subsections (d) through (h), a security interest in fixtures is subordinate to a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the related real property other than the debtor.

Fixtures purchase-money priority. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (h), a perfected security interest in fixtures has priority over a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the real property if the debtor has an interest of record in or is in possession of the real property and:

the security interest is a purchase-money security interest;

the interest of the encumbrancer or owner arises before the goods become fixtures; and

the security interest is perfected by a fixture filing before the goods become fixtures or within twenty days thereafter.

Priority of security interest in fixtures over interests in real property. A perfected security interest in fixtures has priority over a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the real property if:

the debtor has an interest of record in the real property or is in possession of the real property and the security interest:

is perfected by a fixture filing before the interest of the encumbrancer or owner is of record; and

has priority over any conflicting interest of a predecessor in title of the encumbrancer or owner;

before the goods become fixtures, the security interest is perfected by any method permitted by this title and the fixtures are readily removable:

factory or office machines;

equipment that is not primarily used or leased for use in the operation of the real property; or

replacements of domestic appliances that are consumer goods;

the conflicting interest is a lien on the real property obtained by legal or equitable proceedings after the security interest was perfected by any method permitted by this title; or

the security interest is:

created in a manufactured home in a manufactured-home transaction; and

perfected pursuant to a statute described in §

8.9A-311 (a)

(2).

Priority based on consent, disclaimer, or right to remove. A security interest in fixtures, whether or not perfected, has priority over a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the real property if:

the encumbrancer or owner has, in an authenticated record, consented to the security interest or disclaimed an interest in the goods as fixtures; or

the debtor has a right to remove the goods as against the encumbrancer or owner.

Continuation of subdivision (f) (2) priority. The priority of the security interest under subdivision (f) (2) continues for a reasonable time if the debtor’s right to remove the goods as against the encumbrancer or owner terminates.

Priority of construction mortgage. A mortgage is a construction mortgage to the extent that it secures an obligation incurred for the construction of an improvement on land, including the acquisition cost of the land, if a recorded record of the mortgage so indicates. Except as otherwise provided in subsections (e) and (f), a security interest in fixtures is subordinate to a construction mortgage if a record of the mortgage is recorded before the goods become fixtures and the goods become fixtures before the completion of the construction. A mortgage has this priority to the same extent as a construction mortgage to the extent that it is given to refinance a construction mortgage.

Priority of security interest in crops. A perfected security interest in crops growing on real property has priority over a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the real property if the debtor has an interest of record in or is in possession of the real property.

Subsection (i) prevails. Subsection (i) prevails over any inconsistent provisions of the following statutes.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-313; 1973, c. 509; 1983, c. 204; 2000, c. 1007.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1426 (1973).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 97.1.

§ 8.9A-335.
Accessions.

Creation of security interest in accession. A security interest may be created in an accession and continues in collateral that becomes an accession.

Perfection of security interest. If a security interest is perfected when the collateral becomes an accession, the security interest remains perfected in the collateral.

Priority of security interest. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d), the other provisions of this part determine the priority of a security interest in an accession.

Compliance with certificate-of-title statute. A security interest in an accession is subordinate to a security interest in the whole which is perfected by compliance with the requirements of a certificate-of-title statute under §

8.9A-311 (b)

.

Removal of accession after default. After default, subject to Part 6 (§

8.9A-601

et seq.) of this title, a secured party may remove an accession from other goods if the security interest in the accession has priority over the claims of every person having an interest in the whole.

Reimbursement following removal. A secured party that removes an accession from other goods under subsection (e) shall promptly reimburse any holder of a security interest or other lien on, or owner of, the whole or of the other goods, other than the debtor, for the cost of repair of any physical injury to the whole or the other goods. The secured party need not reimburse the holder or owner for any diminution in value of the whole or the other goods caused by the absence of the accession removed or by any necessity for replacing it. A person entitled to reimbursement may refuse permission to remove until the secured party gives adequate assurance for the performance of the obligation to reimburse.

History.

2000, c. 1007.